prince/dictionaries/he-IL.aff
PFX Y N 74
PFX Y   0 ב [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ב וו
PFX Y   0 ב" .
PFX Y   0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ו .
PFX Y   0 ו" .
PFX Y   0 וב [^ו]
PFX Y   0 וב וו
PFX Y   0 וב" .
PFX Y   0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 וכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 וכש וו
PFX Y   0 וכש" .
PFX Y   0 וכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ולכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ולכש וו
PFX Y   0 ולכש" .
PFX Y   0 ולכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ומש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ומש וו
PFX Y   0 ומש" .
PFX Y   0 ומשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 וש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 וש וו
PFX Y   0 וש" .
PFX Y   0 ושו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושב [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושב וו
PFX Y   0 ושב" .
PFX Y   0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושכש וו
PFX Y   0 ושכש" .
PFX Y   0 ושכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושלכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושלכש וו
PFX Y   0 ושלכש" .
PFX Y   0 ושלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושמש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ושמש וו
PFX Y   0 ושמש" .
PFX Y   0 ושמשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 כש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 כש וו
PFX Y   0 כש" .
PFX Y   0 כשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 לכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 לכש וו
PFX Y   0 לכש" .
PFX Y   0 לכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 מש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 מש וו
PFX Y   0 מש" .
PFX Y   0 משו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 ש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 ש וו
PFX Y   0 ש" .
PFX Y   0 שו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 שב [^ו]
PFX Y   0 שב וו
PFX Y   0 שב" .
PFX Y   0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 שכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 שכש וו
PFX Y   0 שכש" .
PFX Y   0 שכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 שלכש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 שלכש וו
PFX Y   0 שלכש" .
PFX Y   0 שלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX Y   0 שמש [^ו]
PFX Y   0 שמש וו
PFX Y   0 שמש" .
PFX Y   0 שמשו ו[^ו]
