prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אותתם/Y
אזלנו/Y
אחזרנו/Y
איידנו/Y
איירה/Y
איישן/Y
אייתן/Y
אלחשה/Y
אמללה/Y
אנגלזנו/Y
אפרה/Y
אצרה/Y
ארגה/Y
ארכנו/Y
אשמן/Y
באשה/Y
בהקה/Y
בוששנו/Y
בחלנו/Y
בטשנו/Y
ביימנו/Y
בייתם/Y
בלבלנו/Y
בלסה/Y
בעבעה/Y
בצבצה/Y
ברברה/Y
בררנו/Y
גבלנו/Y
גהרנו/Y
גוללנו/Y
גזמנו/Y
גמעה/Y
גנזנו/Y
גססנו/Y
געתה/Y
גררנו/Y
דגדגה/Y
דובבה/Y
דוממה/Y
דייקה/Y
דלותי/Y
דמענו/Y
דעכנו/Y
דקדקה/Y
דשדשנו/Y
האזינה/Y
האירה/Y
האפירה/Y
הבהבנו/Y
הבחינה/Y
הבליחה/Y
הגדישה/Y
הגידה/Y
הגיפה/Y
הגעישה/Y
הדהדנו/Y
הואילה/Y
הופיעה/Y
הזדווגה/Y
הזדככה/Y
הזדמרה/Y
הזדנגפה/Y
הזדעפה/Y
הזדקפה/Y
הזדקרה/Y
הזהיבה/Y
הזיעה/Y
הזעיפה/Y
החטיפה/Y
החלימה/Y
החניפה/Y
החציפה/Y
הטיפה/Y
הידללה/Y
הידרדרה/Y
היטיבה/Y
היטשטשנו/Y
היתוספנו/Y
היתמרנו/Y
הכחילה/Y
הלינה/Y
המאיסה/Y
המיטה/Y
הממנו/Y
המתינה/Y
הנעימה/Y
הסיקה/Y
הסלימה/Y
הספיקה/Y
הסתבכה/Y
הסתגלה/Y
הסתגרה/Y
הסתובבה/Y
הסתווגה/Y
הסתחררה/Y
הסתיידה/Y
הסתייעה/Y
הסתכמה/Y
הסתלסלה/Y
הסתמאה/Y
הסתממה/Y
הסתמררה/Y
הסתערבה/Y
הסתפחה/Y
הסתפרה/Y
הסתתמה/Y
העוותה/Y
העיבה/Y
העמיסה/Y
העתירה/Y
הפיחה/Y
הפליצה/Y
הפסידה/Y
הפריזה/Y
הצ'טקמקנו/Y
הצהירה/Y
הצטברה/Y
הצטדקה/Y
הצטיידה/Y
הצטלבה/Y
הצטלמה/Y
הצטלקה/Y
הצטמצמה/Y
הצטמררה/Y
הצטנפה/Y
הצטעצעה/Y
הצטפדה/Y
הצטרכה/Y
הציצה/Y
הצלנו/Y
הצריחה/Y
הקיצה/Y
הקניטה/Y
הקרישה/Y
הרהיבה/Y
הרנינה/Y
הרקיעה/Y
השוויצה/Y
השמינה/Y
השתבחה/Y
השתבצה/Y
השתבשה/Y
השתדכה/Y
השתובבה/Y
השתוללה/Y
השתופפה/Y
השתזפה/Y
השתחלה/Y
השתחצה/Y
השתטחנו/Y
השתיירנו/Y
השתכללה/Y
השתכפלה/Y
השתכשכה/Y
השתלהבה/Y
השתלטה/Y
השתלשלה/Y
השתמטה/Y
השתמרה/Y
השתנקה/Y
השתעלה/Y
השתעשעה/Y
השתפכה/Y
השתפרה/Y
השתקללה/Y
השתקעה/Y
השתקשקה/Y
השתרגה/Y
השתרעה/Y
השתרשה/Y
השתתקה/Y
התאבכה/Y
התאבקה/Y
התאגרפה/Y
התאווררה/Y
התאזרה/Y
התאחדה/Y
התאיידה/Y
התאכזרה/Y
התאכלסה/Y
התאסלמה/Y
התאפסה/Y
התאפרה/Y
התאקלמה/Y
התארכה/Y
התאשפזה/Y
התבאסה/Y
התבגרה/Y
התבדלה/Y
התבהמה/Y
התבודדה/Y
התבוססה/Y
התבזבזה/Y
התבטלה/Y
התבייתה/Y
התבלבלה/Y
התבסמה/Y
התבצעה/Y
התבקעה/Y
התברברה/Y
התברכנו/Y
התבשלנו/Y
התבשרנו/Y
התגבשנו/Y
התגודדנו/Y
התגוררנו/Y
התגייסנו/Y
התגלגלנו/Y
התגלמנו/Y
התגלשנו/Y
התגמשנו/Y
התגנדרנו/Y
התגפפנו/Y
התגרשנו/Y
התדלדלנו/Y
התדרדרנו/Y
התהדרנו/Y
התהלכנו/Y
התהפכנו/Y
התוודענו/Y
התווספנו/Y
התווסתנו/Y
התחבבנו/Y
התחבקנו/Y
התחדדנו/Y
התחוורנו/Y
התחוררנו/Y
התחייבנו/Y
התחככנו/Y
התחלחלנו/Y
התחלקנו/Y
התחמקנו/Y
התחנכנו/Y
התחסדנו/Y
התחפפנו/Y
התחפשנו/Y
התחרדנו/Y
התחרטנו/Y
התחשלה/Y
התחשקה/Y
התייאשה/Y
התייגעה/Y
התייהדה/Y
התייזעה/Y
התייחמה/Y
התיילדה/Y
התייספה/Y
התייעדה/Y
התייעצה/Y
התייפייפה/Y
התייקרה/Y
התיישבה/Y
התייתמה/Y
התכבדנו/Y
התכדרנו/Y
התכווצנו/Y
התכחשנו/Y
התכנסנו/Y
התכערנו/Y
התכרבלנו/Y
התכרסמנו/Y
התכתשנו/Y
התלבשנו/Y
התלהטנו/Y
התלוצצנו/Y
התלחשנו/Y
התלטשנו/Y
התלכלכנו/Y
התלפפנו/Y
התלקקנו/Y
התמהמהנו/Y
התמודדנו/Y
התמוללנו/Y
התמזגנו/Y
התמזמזנו/Y
התמירה/Y
התמלאנו/Y
התמנפנו/Y
התמסטלנו/Y
התמסרנו/Y
התמצאנו/Y
התמקדנו/Y
התמקמנו/Y
התמרדנו/Y
התמרמרנו/Y
התמשכנו/Y
התנבאנו/Y
התנגדנו/Y
התנגשנו/Y
התנדנדנו/Y
התנהגנו/Y
התנודדנו/Y
התנוססנו/Y
התנופפנו/Y
התנזלנו/Y
התנחלנו/Y
התנחמנו/Y
התנכלנו/Y
התנמנמנו/Y
התנענענו/Y
התנפחנו/Y
התנפנפנו/Y
התנצחנו/Y
התנצרנו/Y
התנקמנו/Y
התנשאנו/Y
התנשפנו/Y
התנתבנו/Y
התעברנו/Y
התעודדנו/Y
התעוותם/Y
התעופפנו/Y
התעטפנו/Y
התעייפנו/Y
התעכלנו/Y
התעלמנו/Y
התעלפנו/Y
התעמלנו/Y
התעמעמנו/Y
התעמרנו/Y
התעמתנו/Y
התעסקנו/Y
התעצלה/Y
התעקלה/Y
התעקרה/Y
התערבבה/Y
התערבלנו/Y
התערערה/Y
התעשרה/Y
התעשתן/Y
התפארה/Y
התפגרה/Y
התפוצצה/Y
התפוררה/Y
התפזרה/Y
התפחסה/Y
התפטרה/Y
התפייסה/Y
התפלאה/Y
התפלחה/Y
התפלמסה/Y
התפלפלה/Y
התפלשה/Y
התפנקה/Y
התפעלה/Y
התפענחה/Y
התפצלה/Y
התפקעה/Y
התפקששה/Y
התפרסה/Y
התפרעה/Y
התפרקדה/Y
התפרשה/Y
התפשלה/Y
התפתחה/Y
התקבלה/Y
התקבצה/Y
התקדרה/Y
התקהלה/Y
התקוממה/Y
התקיימה/Y
התקלחנו/Y
התקלפנו/Y
התקמטנו/Y
התקנאנו/Y
התקפדנו/Y
התקצצנו/Y
התקראנו/Y
התקרזלנו/Y
התקרנפנו/Y
התקררנו/Y
התקשחנו/Y
התקשרנו/Y
התרגזנו/Y
התרגענו/Y
התרדדנו/Y
התרווחנו/Y
התרועענו/Y
התרוצצנו/Y
התרחבנו/Y
התרחקנו/Y
התרטבנו/Y
התרכבה/Y
התרככה/Y
התרעמה/Y
התרפטה/Y
התרפקה/Y
התרשלה/Y
התרתחה/Y
זגזגנו/Y
זוודנו/Y
זללנו/Y
זעזענו/Y
זרחנו/Y
חבצה/Y
חגרה/Y
חווטנו/Y
חוקקנו/Y
חטבנו/Y
חככה/Y
חלחלנו/Y
חלמנו/Y
חמסה/Y
חנטה/Y
חננה/Y
חפפה/Y
חצצרה/Y
חרגה/Y
חרזנו/Y
חרצה/Y
חרתנו/Y
טאטאה/Y
טייבנו/Y
טמענו/Y
טפטפנו/Y
טרחנו/Y
טרנספרנו/Y
טרקנו/Y
יבשנו/Y
יהרגו/Y
ייאשם/Y
ייבאנו/Y
ייבמה/Y
ייהדו/Y
ייזענו/Y
ייחלה/Y
ייחמה/Y
ייחצנו/Y
ייסדה/Y
ייספו/Y
ייעדנו/Y
ייעלנו/Y
ייעצנו/Y
ייערם/Y
ייקרנו/Y
ייתרנו/Y
יסדה/Y
יצקה/Y
יקדו/Y
כדררה/Y
כופפה/Y
כיירה/Y
כמשנו/Y
כפתרה/Y
כרטסה/Y
כשכשנו/Y
לגלגנו/Y
להטטנו/Y
לחששנו/Y
לעסנו/Y
מהלנו/Y
מוססנו/Y
מזערנו/Y
מחלנו/Y
מלקנו/Y
מסמסנו/Y
מעכה/Y
מצמצנו/Y
נבחה/Y
נברך/Y
נגחה/Y
נגסה/Y
נדדה/Y
נדמנו/Y
נדפנו/Y
נוחם/Y
נופפנו/Y
נזפנו/Y
נטרה/Y
נמכן/Y
נמסנו/Y
נסקה/Y
נענעה/Y
נצצנו/Y
נקמנו/Y
נקשנו/Y
נשמם/Y
נשנשנו/Y
סבסדה/Y
סוככה/Y
סחררה/Y
סייעה/Y
סלדה/Y
סמכה/Y
סנגרה/Y
סנתזה/Y
ספגנו/Y
סרגנו/Y
סרקנו/Y
סתמנו/Y
עגבנו/Y
עופפנו/Y
עכרנו/Y
עלזנו/Y
עמעמה/Y
עצבבה/Y
עקצנו/Y
ערבלנו/Y
ערערה/Y
ערקה/Y
פברקה/Y
פוררה/Y
פחלצה/Y
פחתן/Y
פטרלה/Y
פייטה/Y
פכרנו/Y
פלרטטנו/Y
פמפמנו/Y
פנצ'רנו/Y
פסענו/Y
פעלנו/Y
פצפצנו/Y
פקססנו/Y
פקפקנו/Y
פרזלנו/Y
פרמטה/Y
פרפנו/Y
צבטנו/Y
צודדה/Y
צופפנו/Y
צותתנו/Y
צחקנו/Y
צייצנו/Y
צלחה/Y
צנזרה/Y
צפנה/Y
צרבה/Y
צרמנו/Y
קודדנו/Y
קוממנו/Y
קטמנו/Y
קייצנו/Y
קנטרה/Y
קפחה/Y
קצצה/Y
קרמה/Y
קרצפה/Y
קרקשה/Y
רגזנו/Y
רופפנו/Y
רחרחה/Y
רמזרה/Y
רצחה/Y
רצצנו/Y
רקחנו/Y
רשרשה/Y
רתמה/Y
שאבה/Y
שאפנו/Y
שגגנו/Y
שדדנו/Y
שוחחנו/Y
שחברנו/Y
שטמנו/Y
שייפנו/Y
שכשכה/Y
שלטטה/Y
שלשלה/Y
שעטנו/Y
שפעלה/Y
שקטנו/Y
שקקנו/Y
שרדנו/Y
שרטנו/Y
שרקנו/Y
שתקה/Y
שתתן/Y
תאמן/Y
תווכה/Y
תושכם/Y
תחבלה/Y
תחזקנו/Y
תמחרה/Y
תמללה/Y
תמצתן/Y
תמררה/Y
תעדפה/Y
תעשנו/Y
תעתקנו/Y
תפקדה/Y
תצפתן/Y
תקשרה/Y
תרגלה/Y
תרצה/Y
